Maine, session 132, LD1015.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §7016 is enacted to read:
§7016. Two-person crews
A train or light engine used in connection with the movement of freight may not be
operated unless it has a crew consisting of at least 2 persons other than persons providing
hostler services or utility services.